Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1543
Writ of execution; when returnable.

The sheriff or other officer to whom any writ of execution is directed shall return such writ to the court to which the writ is returnable as soon as practicable after the writ has been served.

R.S.1867, Code § 510, p. 480;

R.S.1913, § 8089;

C.S.1922, § 9025;

C.S.1929, § 20-1543;

R.S.1943, § 25-1543;

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 11.

Failure to return order of sale within sixty days will not defeat confirmation. Philadelphia Mortgage & Trust Co. v. Buckstaff Bros. Mfg. Co., 61 Neb. 54, 84 N.W. 416 (1900).

Section is not applicable to orders of sale. Jarrett v. Hoover, 54 Neb. 65, 74 N.W. 429 (1898).

This provision is mandatory. Buckley v. Mason, 52 Neb. 639, 72 N.W. 1043 (1897).

Officer must return execution stating what he has done under it. Burkett v. Clark, 46 Neb. 466, 64 N.W. 1113 (1895).